Maine, session 132, LD845.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA c. 110, sub-c. 2-C is enacted to read:
SUBCHAPTER 2-C
FIRST-TIME HOME-BUYER PROGRAM
§1040. First-time Home-buyer Program
1. Definitions. As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "First-time home buyer" means an individual or household that has not owned a
primary residence in the past 3 years.
B. "Program" means the First-time Home-buyer Program established in subsection 2.
2. First-time Home-buyer Program established. The First-time Home-buyer
Program is established for the purpose of assisting first-time home buyers across all
counties in the State by providing access to affordable mortgage loans with low interest
rates and low down payment requirements.
3. Financial terms and conditions of mortgages. The mortgage loans provided
under the program must:
A. Have a loan term of no more than 30 years;
B. Have an interest rate lower than market rates at the time of application;
C. Require a down payment of no more than 5% of the home purchase price; and
D. Have a loan guarantee.
4. Eligibility criteria. To qualify for a mortgage loan under the program, an applicant
must:
A. Be a first-time home buyer;
B. Demonstrate that the home purchase price is equal to or less than the maximum
purchase price for homes as established by the authority in accordance with subsection
5; and
C. Satisfy any additional eligibility criteria for applicants of the program established
by the authority.
5. Administration; rules. The authority shall administer the program. To carry out
the purposes of the program, the authority shall:
A. Establish a method to calculate the maximum purchase price for a home in each
county of the State based on the regional housing market conditions and adjust the
maximum purchase price biennially to account for housing market changes and
inflation;
B. Allocate loan opportunities equitably across all counties in the State and adopt rules
and procedures to monitor and adjust allocations to maintain the equitable geographic
distribution of the program; and
Page 1 - 132LR0946(01)

C. Adopt rules establishing the program application process, the terms and conditions
of the loan guarantees and any other rules necessary for administration of the program.
Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules pursuant to Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
6. Reporting requirements. Beginning in January 2027, the authority shall submit
an annual report on the program to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over housing matters. The annual report must include information regarding:
A. The number of loans issued;
B. The geographic distribution of loans issued;
C. The average purchase price of homes; and
D. Recommendations for improving the program.
7. Funding. The authority may seek and accept funding from public and private
sources, including federal grants, to support the implementation and sustainability of the
program. Money received by the authority on behalf of the program must be used for the
purposes of this subchapter. The program fund must be maintained and administered by
the authority.
Sec. 2. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026.